Hawaii, session 2025, SB1284.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Article 1, section 5, of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii is amended to read as follows: "DUE PROCESS AND EQUAL PROTECTION Section 5.  No person shall be deprived of life, liberty or property without due process of law, nor be denied the equal protection of the laws, nor be denied the enjoyment of the person's civil rights or be discriminated against in the exercise thereof because of race, ethnicity, age, disability, religion, [sex or] national ancestry[.], sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, pregnancy and pregnancy outcomes." SECTION 2.  The question to be printed on the ballot shall be as follows: "Shall the state constitution be amended to clarify that no person shall be deprived of life, liberty or property without due process of law, nor be denied the equal protection of the laws, nor be denied the enjoyment of the person's civil rights or be discriminated against in the exercise thereof because of race, ethnicity, age, disability, religion, national ancestry, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, pregnancy and pregnancy outcomes?" SECTION 3. Constitutional material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New constitutional material is underscored. SECTION 4. This amendment shall take effect upon compliance with article XVII, section 3, of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________